Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXV Domestic Relations
Article 5. Direct Enforcement of Order of Another State Without Registration

407.5501.
Employer’s receipt of income-withholding order of another state.

An income-withholding order issued in another state may be sent by or on behalf of the obligee, or by the support enforcement agency, to the person defined as the obligor’s employer under the income-withholding law of this state without first filing a petition or comparable pleading or registering the order with a tribunal of this state.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 365, § 44; 1998, ch. 101, § 8, 20, effective March 23, 1998; 2015 ch. 18, § 33, effective June 24, 2015.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, Prac. & Proc. Forms, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Child Support, § 263.00.

407.5502.
Employer’s compliance with income-withholding order of another state.

Upon receipt of an income-withholding order, the obligor’s employer shall immediately provide a copy of an order to the obligor.

The employer shall treat an income-withholding order that has been issued in another state and that appears regular on its face as if it had been issued by a tribunal of this state.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section and KRS

407.5503

, the employer shall withhold and distribute the funds as directed in the withholding order by complying with terms of the order terms that specify:

The duration and amount of periodic payments of current child support, stated as a sum certain;

The person designated to receive payments and the address to which the payments are to be forwarded;

Medical support, whether in the form of periodic cash payment, stated as a sum certain, or ordering the obligor to provide health insurance coverage for the child under a policy available through the obligor’s employment;

The amount of periodic payments of fees and costs for a support enforcement agency, the issuing tribunal, and the obligee’s attorney, stated as sums certain; and

The amount of periodic payments of arrearages and interest on arrearages, stated as sums certain.

An employer shall comply with the law of the state of the obligor’s principal place of employment for withholding from income with respect to:

The employer’s fee for processing an income-withholding order;

The maximum amount permitted to be withheld from the obligor’s income; and

The times within which the employer must implement the withholding order and forward the child support payment.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 101, § 9, effective March 23, 1998; 2015 ch. 18, § 34, effective June 24, 2015; 2016 ch. 77, § 10, effective July 15, 2016.

407.5503.
Employer’s compliance with multiple income-withholding orders.

If an obligor’s employer receives two (2) or more income-withholding orders with respect to the earnings of the same obligor, the employer satisfies the terms of the two (2) or more orders if the employer complies with the law of the state of the obligor’s principal place of employment to establish the priorities for withholding and allocating income withheld for two (2) or more child support obligees.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 101, § 10, effective March 23, 1998; 2015 ch. 18, § 35, effective June 24, 2015.

407.5504.
Immunity from civil liability.

An employer that complies with an income-withholding order issued in another state in accordance with this article is not subject to civil liability to an individual or agency with regard to the employer’s withholding of child support from the obligor’s income.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 101, § 11, effective March 23, 1998; 2015 ch. 18, § 36, effective June 24, 2015.

407.5505.
Penalties for noncompliance.

An employer that willfully fails to comply with an income-withholding order issued in another state and received for enforcement is subject to the same penalties that may be imposed for noncompliance with an order issued by a tribunal of this state.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 101, § 12, effective March 23, 1998; 2015 ch. 18, § 37, effective June 24, 2015.

407.5506.
Contest by obligor.

An obligor may contest the validity or enforcement of an income-withholding order issued in another state and received directly by an employer in this state by registering the order in a tribunal of this state and filing a contest to that order as provided in Article 6 of this chapter, or otherwise contesting the order in the same manner as if the order had been issued by a tribunal of this state.

The obligor shall give notice of the contest to:

A support enforcement agency providing services to the obligee;

Each employer that has directly received an income-withholding order relating to the obligor; and

The person designated to receive payments in the income-withholding order, or, if no person is designated, the obligee.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 101, § 13, effective March 23, 1998; 2015 ch. 18, § 38, effective June 24, 2015.

407.5507.
Administrative enforcement of orders.

A party or support enforcement agency seeking to enforce a support order or an income-withholding order, or both, issued in another state or a foreign support order may send the documents required for registering the order to a support enforcement agency of this state.

Upon receipt of the documents, the support enforcement agency, without initially seeking to register the order, shall consider and, if appropriate, use any administrative procedure authorized by the law of this state to enforce a support order or an income-withholding order, or both. If the obligor does not contest administrative enforcement, the order need not be registered. If the obligor contests the validity or administrative enforcement of the order, the support enforcement agency shall register the order pursuant to KRS

407.5101

to

407.5902

.

HISTORY:

Repealed, reenact., and amend. Acts 1998, ch. 101, § 14, effective March 23, 1998; 2015 ch. 18, § 39, effective June 24, 2015.